Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
CHAPTER 2 Appeals to Jury in Justice of the Peace Court

5-2-1 through 5-2-6.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-2, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections were based on Orig. Code 1863, §§ 4069, 4070, 4082; Code 1868, §§ 4098, 4099, 4111; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 153, §§ 1 — 6; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 190, § 1; Code 1882, §§ 4157a — 4157f, 4157i; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 64, § 1; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 95, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4140 — 4147; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4740 — 4747; Ga. L. 1921, p. 116, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 6-304, 6-401 — 6-407; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 312, § 1.